Arkansas statutes. Title 22 Public Property
Chapter 1

General Provisions

Subchapter 1

— General Provisions

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

22-1-101. Sale of surplus commodities to not-for-profit organizations before offer for sale to public — Definitions.

As used in this section:

(1)

“Commodities” means commodities under §19-11-203; and

(2)

“Not-for-profit organization” means a private corporation under §4-28-201 et seq. that:

(A)

Has a benevolent, philanthropic, patriotic, or charitable purpose; and

(B)

Performs a function that would be performed at the public expense if it were not performed by the organization.

(b)

Before a state, county, or municipal government entity offers surplus commodities for sale to the public, the state, county, or municipal government entity:

(1)

Shall consider offers by not-for-profit organizations for the surplus commodities made by not-for-profit organizations; and

(2)

May accept a reasonable bid or offer for the surplus commodities from a not-for-profit organization.

History.

Acts 2013, No. 1020, § 2.

Subchapter 2

— Adverse Possession

Preambles.

Acts 1965, No. 16, contained a preamble which read:

“Whereas, properties of municipally owned waterworks systems in this state are acquired and are maintained at great public expense; and

“Whereas, retention of title to said properties is necessary for the furnishing of water and for preventing the pollution thereof; and

“Whereas, it shall be the public policy of this state that no person acquire title to such properties except by the purchase thereof;

“Now therefore….”

Effective Dates.

Acts 1923, No. 666, § 8: effective on passage. Emergency declared. Approved Mar. 23, 1923.

Acts 2001, No. 1312, § 2: Apr. 5, 2001. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly that the properties and easements of drainage districts are acquired and maintained at great expense to the farmers and landowners within the districts; that these properties and servitudes are subject to extended periods of time where no person observes the activities which are actually taking place on these lands and easements; that retention of title to these properties are necessary for drainage and flood control management on lands within the districts; and that it shall be the public policy of this state that no person acquire title to drainage district properties by adverse possession and this policy should have immediate force and effect. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

22-1-201. Roads and parks.

(a)

No title or right of possession to any public thoroughfare, road, highway, or public park, or any portion thereof, shall or can be acquired by adverse possession or adverse occupancy, and the right of the public or of the proper authorities of any county to open or have opened any such public thoroughfare, road, highway, park, or parts thereof shall not be defeated in any action or proceeding by reason of adverse possession or adverse occupancy of any such public thoroughfare, road, highway, or park, or any portion thereof where adverse possession or occupancy commenced after the passage of this section.

(b)

Any thoroughfare, road, or highway that may be platted by any landowner and dedicated to the public as a public thoroughfare, road, or highway where the plat shows or the bill of assurance states the width of the road or highway or any park dedicated by any landowner to the public as a public park for the use and benefit of the public shall not be acquired by adverse possession or adverse occupancy of any such land so dedicated to the public, or any portion thereof, where the adverse possession or occupancy commenced after the passage of this section.

History.

Acts 1923, No. 666, §§ 1, 2; Pope's Dig., § 8958; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 37-109, 37-110.

Publisher's Notes.

With reference to the term “passage of this section,” Acts 1923, No. 666, § 8, declared an emergency and provided the act would be effective from and after its passage. The act was signed by the Governor on March 23, 1923.

Cross References.

Designation as county roads of direct routes to county courthouse, §27-66-204.

Designation of land as county road upon being deeded to county as public thoroughfare, §27-66-208.

Designation of street as public road upon dedication, §27-66-207.

Streets, alleys, or public parks, no right or title to acquired by adverse possession, §14-301-113.

22-1-202. Municipal waterworks lands.

Regardless of the beginning date thereof, no adverse possession or adverse use of lands or easements owned by a municipality for municipal waterworks purposes shall or can ripen into title or permanent right. This section shall have no application to any possession or use which ripened into title or permanent right prior to the enactment of this section.

History.

Acts 1965, No. 16, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 37-111.

Publisher's Notes.

In reference to the term “enactment of this section,” Acts 1965, No. 16, was signed by the Governor on February 1, 1965, and took effect on June 10, 1965.

22-1-203. Public school system property — Definition.

(a)

As used in this section, “public school system” means any school system, district, college, or university in the State of Arkansas which is supported wholly or in part by tax dollars, whether federal, state, or local.

(b)

No title or right of possession to any public school system property, or any portion thereof, shall or can be acquired by adverse possession or adverse occupancy thereof. The right of the public school system or of the proper school authorities of any public school system shall not be defeated in any action or proceeding by reason of adverse possession or adverse occupancy of any public school system property, or any portion thereof, where the parties claiming such adverse possession commence legal action after January 1, 1983. This section is to serve as legal notice to such parties that claims to adverse possession of public school properties commenced after January 1, 1983, shall be unwarranted and ineffective, and those claims shall be dismissed by the appropriate court.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 209, §§ 1, 2; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 37-112, 37-113.

22-1-204. Realty owned by cities, towns, school districts, counties, or state.

No title or right of possession to realty by an incorporated town, city of the second class, city of the first class, school district, county, or the state may be defeated in any action or proceeding because of adverse possession.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 354, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 37-114.

22-1-205. Property of drainage districts — Definition.

(a)

As used in this section, a “drainage district” means a:

(1)

Drainage improvement district formed by an act of the General Assembly;

(2)

Drainage improvement district formed and operated under §14-120-101 et seq.; or

(3)

Drainage improvement district formed and operated under §14-121-101 et seq.

(b)(1)

No title or right of possession to property of a drainage district, or any portion thereof, shall be acquired by adverse possession or adverse occupancy.

(2)

No easement or right of way of a drainage district for flowage, storage rights, and any other servitude upon, over, and across any lands, or any portion thereof, shall be acquired by adverse possession or adverse occupancy.

(c)

The real property rights of a drainage district shall not be defeated in any cause of action or proceeding by reason of adverse possession or adverse occupancy of district property, or any portion thereof, where the parties claiming the adverse possession commence legal action after April 5, 2001.

History.

Acts 2001, No. 1312, § 1.

22-1-206. Property of levee districts — Definition.

(a)

As used in this section, a “levee district” means a:

(1)

Levee district formed by Act 97 of 1911 and any other levee district formed by an act of the General Assembly;

(2)

Watershed improvement district formed under the Arkansas Irrigation, Drainage, and Watershed Improvement District Act of 1949, §14-117-101 et seq.;

(3)

Levee district or levee and drainage district formed under §14-120-101 et seq.; and

(4)

Levee improvement district formed under §14-123-201 et seq.

(b)(1)

No title or right of possession to property of a levee district or any portion of a district's property shall be acquired by adverse possession or adverse occupancy.

(2)

No easement or right of way of a levee district for flowage, storage rights, and any other servitude upon, over, and across any lands or any portion of lands shall be acquired by adverse possession or adverse occupancy.

(c)

The real property rights of a levee district shall not be defeated in any cause of action or proceeding by reason of adverse possession or adverse occupancy of a district's property or any portion of a district's property, where the parties claiming the adverse possession commence legal action after July 16, 2003.

History.

Acts 2003, No. 861, § 1.